test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-even-a-circ_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - hattâ: # â-stems hattu
    hattâ+N+Sg+Nom: hattâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Gen: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Acc: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Ill: haatân
    hattâ+N+Sg+Loc: haatâst
    hattâ+N+Sg+Com: hattáin
    hattâ+N+Ess: hattân
    hattâ+N+Par: hattâd
    hattâ+N+Pl+Nom: haatah
    hattâ+N+Pl+Gen: haatâi
    hattâ+N+Pl+Acc: haatâid
    hattâ+N+Pl+Ill: hattáid
    hattâ+N+Pl+Loc: haatâin
    hattâ+N+Pl+Com: hatâiguin
    hattâ+N+Pl+Abe: hatâittáá

  Noun - kielâ: # â-stems
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kielâ # kieLâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Acc: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kielân # kieLâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe: kielâttáá # kieˊlâttáá
    kielâ+N+Ess: kiellân
    kielâ+N+Par: kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom: kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen: kielâi
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc: kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill: kieláid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc: kielâin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com: kielâiguin # kieˊlâiguin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kielâittáá # kieˊlâittáá
    
        
  Noun - kuorgâ: # â-stems
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuorgâ # kuorˊgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuorgâst
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Com: kuorgáin # kuorˊgáin
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuorgâttáá #kuoˊrgâttáá
    kuorgâ+N+Ess: kuorgân #kuorˊgân
    kuorgâ+N+Par: kuorgâd # kuorˊgâd
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuorgah
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Gen: kuorgâi
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuorgâid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuorgáid # kuorˊgáid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuorgâin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Com: kuorgâiguin # kuoˊrgâiguin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuorgâttáá # kuoˊrgâttáá
    
  Noun - laahâ: # â-stems
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laahâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: laavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahhân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahhâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: laavâi
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: lavâiguin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavâittáá

  Noun - sollâ: # â-stems 
    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: sollâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Acc: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: soolân
    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: soolâst
    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: solláin
    sollâ+N+Sg+Abe: solâttáá
    sollâ+N+Ess: sollân
    sollâ+N+Par: sollâd
    sollâ+N+Pl+Nom: soolah
    sollâ+N+Pl+Gen: soolâi
    sollâ+N+Pl+Acc: soolâid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Ill: solláid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Loc: soolâin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Com: solâiguin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: solâittáá
  
